North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163A. Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act.
§ 163A-999.

Table of Comparable Sections for Chapter 163A of the North Carolina General Statutes Re-recodified Into Chapters 120C, 138A, and 163

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections in Chapters 120C, 138A, and 163, and their former section numbers in Chapter 163A.

tablenum=“=table24”> =c1

Chapter 138A

=c2

Subchapter II

=c1

Article 1

=c2

Article 5

=c1 138A-1 =c2 163A-150 =c1 138A-2 =c2 163A-151
=c1 138A-3 =c2 163A-152
=c1 138A-4 =c2 163A-153
=c1

Article 2

=c2

Article 1

=c1 138A-6 =c2 163A-1
=c1 138A-7 =c2 163A-2
=c1 138A-8 =c2 163A-3
=c1 138A-9 =c2 163A-5 =c2

Article 5

=c1 138A-10 =c2 163A-154
=c1 138A-11 =c2 163A-155
=c1 138A-12 =c2 163A-156
=c1 138A-13 =c2 163A-157
=c1 138A-13.5 =c2 Added by 2018-146 - no Chapter 163A counterpart
=c1 138A-14 =c2 163A-158
=c1 138A-15 =c2 163A-159
=c1

Article 3

=c2

Article 6

=c1 138A-21 =c2 163A-186
=c1 138A-22 =c2 163A-187
=c1 138A-23 =c2 163A-188
=c1 138A-24 =c2 163A-189
=c1 138A-25 =c2 163A-190
=c1 138A-26 =c2 163A-191 =c1 138A-27 =c2 163A-192
=c1 138A-28 =c2 163A-193
=c1

Article 4

=c2

Article 7
=c1 138A-31 =c2 163A-211 =c1 138A-32 =c2 163A-212
=c1 138A-33 =c2 163A-213
=c1 138A-34 =c2 163A-214
=c1 138A-35 =c2 163A-215
=c1 138A-36 =c2 163A-216
=c1 138A-37 =c2 163A-217
=c1 138A-38 =c2 163A-218
=c1 138A-39 =c2 163A-219
=c1 138A-40 =c2 163A-220 =c1 138A-41 =c2 163A-221
=c1
Article 5

=c2

Article 9

=c1 138A-45 =c2 163A-415 =c1

Chapter 163

=c2

Subchapter III

=c1

Subchapter I

=c2

Article 15

=c1

Article 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-1 =c2 163A-700
=c1 163-2 previously repealed
=c1 163-3 =c2 163A-701
=c1
Article 2

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-8 =c2 163A-716
=c1 163-9 =c2 163A-717 =c1 163-10 =c2 163A-718
=c1 163-11 =c2 163A-719
=c1 163-12 =c2 163A-720
=c1 163-13 =c2 163A-721
=c1
Subchapter II

=c2

Article 16

=c1

Article 3

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-19
=c2 163A-2 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-20 =c2 163A-740
=c1 163-21 =c2 163A-2 (in Article 1, not 16) =c1 163-22 =c2 163A-741
=c1 163-22.1
previously repealed =c1 163-22.2 =c2 163A-742
=c1 163-22.3 =c2 163A-743
=c1 163-23
=c2 163A-4 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-24 =c2 163A-744
=c1 163-25 =c2 163A-745
=c1 163-26 =c2 163A-6 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-27 =c2 163A-6 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-27.1 =c2 163A-750
=c1 163-27.2 =c2 163A-7 (in Article 1, not 16) =c1 163-28
=c2 163A-5 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1
Article 4

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-30 =c2 163A-766
=c1 163-31 =c2 163A-767
=c1 163-32 =c2 163A-768 =c1 163-33 =c2 163A-769
=c1 163-33.1 =c2 163A-770
=c1 163-33.2 =c2 163A-771
=c1 163-33.3 =c2 163A-772
=c1 163-34 =c2 163A-773
=c1 163-35 =c2 163A-774
=c1 163-35.1
(formerly =c1
163-35(b) (portion)) =c2 163A-775 =c1 163-36 =c2 163A-776
=c1 163-37 =c2 163A-777
=c1 163-37.1 =c2 163A-778 =c1
Article 4A

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-38 =c2 163A-795
=c1 163-39 =c2 163A-796
=c1 163-40 =c2 163A-797 =c1 163-40.1 =c2 163A-798
=c1

Article 5

=c2

Part 4
=c1 163-41 =c2 163A-815
=c1 163-41.1 =c2 163A-816
=c1 163-41.2 =c2 163A-817
=c1 163-42 =c2 163A-818
=c1 163-42.1 =c2 163A-819
=c1 163-43 =c2 163A-820
=c1 163-44 previously repealed
=c1 163-45 =c2 163A-821
=c1 163-46 =c2 163A-822 =c1 163-47 =c2 163A-823
=c1 163-48 =c2 163A-824
=c1
Subchapter III

=c2

Article 17

=c1

Article 6

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-54 =c2 163A-840
=c1 163-55 =c2 163A-841
=c1 163-56
previously repealed
=c1 163-57 =c2 163A-842
=c1 163-58
previously repealed
=c1 163-59 =c2 163A-843
=c1
Article 7
previously repealed

=c1

Article 7A

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-82.1 =c2 163A-860
=c1 163-82.2 =c2 163A-861
=c1 163-82.3 =c2 163A-862
=c1 163-82.4 =c2 163A-863
=c1 163-82.5 =c2 163A-864
=c1 163-82.6 =c2 163A-865
=c1 163-82.6A =c2 163A-866
=c1 163-82.7 =c2 163A-867
=c1 163-82.7A =c2 163A-868
=c1 163-82.8 =c2 163A-869
=c1 163-82.8A =c2 163A-869.1 =c1 163-82.9 =c2 163A-870
=c1 163-82.10 =c2 163A-871
=c1 163-82.10A =c2 163A-872
=c1 163-82.10B =c2 163A-873
=c1 163-82.11 =c2 163A-874
=c1 163-82.12 =c2 163A-875
=c1 163-82.13 =c2 163A-876
=c1 163-82.14 =c2 163A-877
=c1 163-82.15 =c2 163A-878
=c1 163-82.15A =c2 163A-879
=c1 163-82.16 =c2 163A-880
=c1 163-82.17 =c2 163A-881
=c1 163-82.18 =c2 163A-882
=c1 163-82.19 =c2 163A-883
=c1 163-82.20 =c2 163A-884
=c1 163-82.20A =c2 163A-885
=c1 163-82.21 =c2 163A-886
=c1 163-82.22 =c2 163A-887
=c1 163-82.23 =c2 163A-888
=c1 163-82.24 =c2 163A-889
=c1 163-82.25 previously repealed
=c1 163-82.26 =c2 163A-890
=c1 163-82.27 =c2 163A-891
=c1 163-82.28 =c2 163A-892
=c1
Article 8

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-84 =c2 163A-910
=c1 163-85 =c2 163A-911
=c1 163-86 =c2 163A-912
=c1 163-87 =c2 163A-913
=c1 163-88 =c2 163A-914
=c1 163-88.1 =c2 163A-915
=c1 163-89 =c2 163A-916
=c1 163-90 =c2 163A-917 =c1 163-90.1 =c2 163A-918
=c1 163-90.2 =c2 163A-919
=c1 163-90.3 =c2 163A-920
=c1

Article 8A

=c2

Part 4

=c1 163-91 =c2 163A-935
=c1

Subchapter IV

=c2

Article 18

=c1

Article 9
=c1 163-96 =c2 163A-950
=c1 163-97 =c2 163A-951
=c1 163-97.1 =c2 163A-952 =c1 163-98 =c2 163A-953
=c1 163-99 =c2 163A-954
=c1
Subchapter V
=c2 Article 19 =c1
Article 10

=c2

Part 1

=c1 163-104 =c2 163A-970
=c1 163-105 =c2 163A-971
=c1 163-106
(containing only former =c1
subsections (a), (a1)) =c2 163A-972 =c1 163-106.1 (containing former
=c1
163-106(b)) =c2 163A-973 =c1 163-106.2
(containing former =c1
163-106(c)) =c2 163A-974 =c1 163-106.3 (containing former =c1
163-106(d)) =c2 163A-975
=c1 163-106.4 (containing former =c1
163-106(e))
=c2 163A-976
=c1 163-106.5 (containing former =c1
163-106(f), (g), (j)) =c2 163A-977 =c1 163-106.6 (containing former =c1
163-106(h)) =c2 163A-978 =c1 163-107 =c2 163A-979
=c1 163-107.1 =c2 163A-980 =c1 163-108 =c2 163A-981
=c1 163-108.1 =c2 163A-982
=c1 163-109
previously repealed
=c1 163-110 =c2 163A-983
=c1 163-111 =c2 163A-984
=c1 163-112 =c2 163A-985
=c1 163-113 =c2 163A-986
=c1 163-114 =c2 163A-987
=c1 163-115 =c2 163A-988
=c1 163-116 thru 163-118
previously repealed
=c1 163-119 =c2 163A-989
=c1

Article 11

=c2

Part 2

=c1 163-122 =c2 163A-1005
=c1 163-123 =c2 163A-1006
=c1 163-124 =c2 163A-1007
=c1

Article 11A
previously repealed
=c1
Article 11B

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-127.1 =c2 163A-1025
=c1 163-127.2 =c2 163A-1026
=c1 163-127.3 =c2 163A-1027
=c1 163-127.4 =c2 163A-1028
=c1 163-127.5 =c2 163A-1029
=c1 163-127.6 =c2 163A-1030
=c1

Subchapter VI

=c2

Article 20

=c1

Article 12

=c2

Part 1

=c1 163-128 =c2 163A-1045
=c1 163-129 =c2 163A-1046
=c1 163-130 =c2 163A-1047
=c1 163-130.1 =c2 163A-1048
=c1 163-130.2 =c2 163A-1049
=c1 163-131 =c2 163A-1050
=c1

Article 12A

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-132.1
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1A
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1B
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1C =c2 163A-1065
=c1 163-132.2
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.3 =c2 163A-1071
=c1 163-132.3A =c2 163A-1072
=c1 163-132.4 =c2 163A-1073
=c1 163-132.5 =c2 163A-1074
=c1 163-132.5A
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.5B =c2 163A-1075 =c1 163-132.5C =c2 163A-1076
=c1 163-132.5D =c2 163A-1077 =c1 163-132.5E
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.5F =c2 163A-1078
=c1 163-132.5G =c2 163A-1079
=c1 163-132.6 previously repealed
=c1
Articles 13, 14 previously repealed

=c1

Article 14A

=c2

Part 3

=c1

Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-165 =c2 163A-1095 =c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-165.1 =c2 163A-1105
=c1 163-165.2 =c2 163A-1106
=c1 163-165.3 =c2 163A-1107
=c1 163-165.4 =c2 163A-1108
=c1 163-165.4A =c2 163A-1109
=c1 163-165.4B =c2 163A-1110
=c1 163-165.4C =c2 163A-1111
=c1 163-165.5 =c2 163A-1112
=c1 163-165.5A expired
=c1 163-165.5B =c2 163A-1113
=c1 163-165.6 =c2 163A-1114 =c1 163-165.7 =c2 163A-1115
=c1 163-165.8 =c2 163A-1116
=c1 163-165.9 =c2 163A-1117
=c1 163-165.9A =c2 163A-1118
=c1 163-165.10 =c2 163A-1119 =c1
Part 3

=c2

Subpart 3
=c1 163-166 previously repealed
=c1 163-166.01 =c2 163A-1130
=c1 163-166.1 =c2 163A-1131
=c1 163-166.2 =c2 163A-1132
=c1 163-166.3 =c2 163A-1133
=c1 163-166.4 =c2 163A-1134
=c1 163-166.5 =c2 163A-1135
=c1 163-166.6 =c2 163A-1136
=c1 163-166.7 =c2 163A-1137
=c1 163-166.7A =c2 163A-1138
=c1 163-166.8 =c2 163A-1139
=c1 163-166.9 =c2 163A-1140
=c1 163-166.10 =c2 163A-1141
=c1 163-166.11 =c2 163A-1142
=c1 163-166.11A =c2 163A-1143
=c1 163-166.12 =c2 163A-1144
=c1 163-166.13 =c2 163A-1145
=c1 163-166.14 =c2 163A-1146
=c1 163-166.15 =c2 163A-1147
=c1 163-166.16 =c2 163A-1145.1 =c1 163-166.17 =c2 163A-1145.2 =c1 163-166.18 =c2 163A-1145.3 =c1
Article 15
previously repealed

=c1

Article 15A

=c2

Part 4
=c1 163-182 =c2 163A-1165
=c1 163-182.1 =c2 163A-1166
=c1 163-182.1A =c2 163A-1167
=c1 163-182.1B =c2 163A-1168
=c1 163-182.2 =c2 163A-1169
=c1 163-182.3 =c2 163A-1170
=c1 163-182.4 =c2 163A-1171
=c1 163-182.5 =c2 163A-1172
=c1 163-182.6 =c2 163A-1173
=c1 163-182.7 =c2 163A-1174
=c1 163-182.7A =c2 163A-1175
=c1 163-182.8 =c2 163A-1176
=c1 163-182.9 =c2 163A-1177
=c1 163-182.10 =c2 163A-1178
=c1 163-182.11 =c2 163A-1179
=c1 163-182.12 =c2 163A-1180
=c1 163-182.13 =c2 163A-1181
=c1 163-182.13A =c2 163A-1182
=c1 163-182.14 =c2 163A-1183
=c1 163-182.15 =c2 163A-1184
=c1 163-182.16 =c2 163A-1185
=c1 163-182.17 =c2 163A-1186
=c1
Article 16
previously repealed
=c1
Article 17

=c2

Part 5
=c1 163-201 =c2 163A-1205
=c1 163-201.1 =c2 163A-1206
=c1 163-201.2
previously repealed =c1 163-202 =c2 163A-1207
=c1
Article 18

=c2

Part 6
=c1 163-208 =c2 163A-1225
=c1 163-209 =c2 163A-1226
=c1 163-209.1 =c2 163A-1227
=c1 163-209.2 =c2 163A-1228
=c1 163-210 =c2 163A-1229
=c1 163-211 =c2 163A-1230
=c1 163-212 =c2 163A-1231
=c1 163-213 =c2 163A-1232
=c1
Article 18A

=c2

Part 7
=c1 163-213.1 =c2 163A-1250
=c1 163-213.2 =c2 163A-1251
=c1 163-213.3 =c2 163A-1252
=c1 163-213.4 =c2 163A-1253
=c1 163-213.5 =c2 163A-1254
=c1 163-213.6 =c2 163A-1255
=c1 163-213.7 =c2 163A-1256
=c1 163-213.8 =c2 163A-1257
=c1 163-213.9 =c2 163A-1258
=c1 163-213.10 previously transferred
=c1 163-213.11
previously repealed =c1
Article 19

=c2

Part 8
=c1 163-218 =c2 163A-1275
=c1 163-219 =c2 163A-1276
=c1 163-220 =c2 163A-1277
=c1 163-221 =c2 163A-1278
=c1
Subchapter VII

=c2

Article 21
=c1
Article 20

=c2

Part 1 =c1 163-226 =c2 163A-1295
=c1 163-226.1 =c2 163A-1296
=c1 163-226.2 =c2 163A-1297
=c1 163-226.3 =c2 163A-1298
=c1 163-227
previously repealed
=c1 163-227.1 =c2 163A-1299
=c1 163-227.2
(containing former 163-227.2(a), (b), =c1
(c)-(e), (e2),
(f), (h), (i))
=c2 163A-1300 =c1 163-227.3 (recodified by the Codifier =c1
as 163-227.10)) =c2 163A-1305 =c1 163-227.4
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(b1), (j))
=c2 163A-1301 =c1 163-227.5 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(e1))
=c2 163A-1302 =c1 163-227.6 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(g), (g1))
=c2 163A-1303 =c1 163-227.7
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(g2), (g3)) =c2 163A-1304 =c1 163-227.8, 163-227.9 reserved =c1 163-228 =c2 163A-1306
=c1 163-229 =c2 163A-1307
=c1 163-230 previously repealed =c1 163-230.1 =c2 163A-1308
=c1 163-230.2 =c2 163A-1309 =c1 163-231 =c2 163A-1310
=c1 163-232 =c2 163A-1311
=c1 163-232.1 =c2 163A-1312
=c1 163-233 =c2 163A-1313
=c1 163-233.1 =c2 163A-1314
=c1 163-234 =c2 163A-1315
=c1 163-235
previously repealed
=c1 163-236 =c2 163A-1316
=c1 163-237 =c2 163A-1317
=c1 163-238 =c2 163A-1318
=c1 163-239 =c2 163A-1319
=c1 163-240 thru 163-240.5
Expired
=c1
Article 21 previously repealed

=c1

Article 21A

=c2

Part 2
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-258.1 =c2 163A-1335
=c1 163-258.2 =c2 163A-1336
=c1 163-258.3 =c2 163A-1337
=c1 163-258.4 =c2 163A-1338
=c1 163-258.5 =c2 163A-1339
=c1 163-258.6 =c2 163A-1340
=c1 163-258.7 =c2 163A-1341
=c1 163-258.8 =c2 163A-1342
=c1 163-258.9 =c2 163A-1343
=c1 163-258.10 =c2 163A-1344
=c1 163-258.11 =c2 163A-1345
=c1 163-258.12 =c2 163A-1346
=c1 163-258.13 =c2 163A-1347
=c1 163-258.14 =c2 163A-1348
=c1 163-258.15 =c2 163A-1349
=c1 163-258.16 =c2 163A-1350
=c1 163-258.17 =c2 163A-1351
=c1 163-258.18 =c2 163A-1352
=c1 163-258.19 =c2 163A-1353
=c1 163-258.20 =c2 163A-1354
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-258.26 =c2 163A-1365
=c1 163-258.27 =c2 163A-1366
=c1 163-258.28 =c2 163A-1367 =c1 163-258.29 =c2 163A-1368
=c1 163-258.30 =c2 163A-1369 =c1 163-258.31 =c2 163A-1370
=c1
Subchapter VIII

=c1

Article 22

=c2

Article 22
=c1 163-271 =c2 163A-1385
=c1 163-272
previously repealed
=c1 163-272.1 =c2 163A-1386
=c1 163-273 =c2 163A-1387
=c1 163-274 =c2 163A-1388
=c1 163-275 =c2 163A-1389
=c1 163-276 =c2 163A-1390
=c1 163-277 =c2 163A-1391
=c1 163-278 =c2 163A-1392
=c1
Article 22A

=c2

Article 23
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-278.5 =c2 163A-1410
=c1 163-278.6 =c2 163A-1411
=c1 163-278.7 =c2 163A-1412
=c1 163-278.7A =c2 163A-1413
=c1 163-278.8 =c2 163A-1414
=c1 163-278.8A =c2 163A-1415
=c1 163-278.8B =c2 163A-1416
=c1 163-278.8C =c2 163A-1417
=c1 163-278.9 =c2 163A-1418
=c1 163-278.9A =c2 163A-1419
=c1 163-278.10 =c2 163A-1420
=c1 163-278.10A =c2 163A-1421
=c1 163-278.11 =c2 163A-1422
=c1 163-278.12 =c2 163A-1423
=c1 163-278.12A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.12B reserved
=c1 163-278.12C =c2 163A-1424
=c1 163-278.13 =c2 163A-1425
=c1 163-278.13A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.13B =c2 163A-1426
=c1 163-278.13C =c2 163A-1427 =c1 163-278.14 =c2 163A-1428
=c1 163-278.14A =c2 163A-1429 =c1 163-278.15 =c2 163A-1430
=c1 163-278.16 =c2 163A-1431 =c1 163-278.16A =c2 163A-1432
=c1 163-278.16B =c2 163A-1433 =c1 163-278.17 =c2 163A-1434
=c1 163-278.18 =c2 163A-1435 =c1 163-278.19 =c2 163A-1436
=c1 163-278.19A =c2 163A-1437 =c1 163-278.19B =c2 163A-1438
=c1 163-278.20
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.21 =c2 163A-1439
=c1 163-278.22 =c2 163A-1440
=c1 163-278.23 =c2 163A-1441
=c1 163-278.24 =c2 163A-1442
=c1 163-278.25 =c2 163A-1443
=c1 163-278.26 =c2 163A-1444
=c1 163-278.27 =c2 163A-1445 =c1 163-278.28 =c2 163A-1446
=c1 163-278.29 =c2 163A-1447 =c1 163-278.30 =c2 163A-1448
=c1 163-278.31
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.32 =c2 163A-1449
=c1 163-278.33 =c2 163A-1450
=c1 163-278.34 =c2 163A-1451
=c1 163-278.34A =c2 163A-1452
=c1 163-278.35 =c2 163A-1453
=c1 163-278.36 previously repealed
=c1 163-278.37 =c2 163A-1454
=c1 163-278.38 =c2 163A-1455
=c1
Part 1A

=c2

Part 2 =c1 163-278.38Z =c2 163A-1475
=c1 163-278.39 =c2 163A-1476 =c1 163-278.39A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.39B previously recodified
=c1 163-278.39C =c2 163A-1477
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Part 3
=c1 163-278.40 =c2 163A-1495
=c1 163-278.40A =c2 163A-1496
=c1 163-278.40B =c2 163A-1497
=c1 163-278.40C =c2 163A-1498
=c1 163-278.40D =c2 163A-1499
=c1 163-278.40E =c2 163A-1500
=c1 163-278.40F =c2 163A-1501
=c1 163-278.40G =c2 163A-1502
=c1 163-278.40H =c2 163A-1503
=c1 163-278.40I =c2 163A-1504
=c1 163-278.40J =c2 163A-1505
=c1
Articles 22B, 22C
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22D

=c2

Article 24
=c1 163-278.69 =c2 163A-1520
=c1
Articles 22E, 22F
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22J

=c2

Article 25
=c1 163-278.99E =c2 163A-1535
=c1
Articles 22G, 22H
previously repealed
=c1
Articles 22I, K, L reserved
=c1
Article 22M

=c2

Article 26
=c1 163-278.300 =c2 163A-1550
=c1 163-278.301 =c2 163A-1551 =c1 163-278.302 thru
=c2 163A-1552
thru =c1 163-278.305 reserved =c2 163A-1555 reserved
=c1 163-278.306 =c2 163A-1556
=c1 163-278.307 =c2 163A-1557
=c1 163-278.308 =c2 163A-1558 =c1 163-278.309 =c2 163A-1559
=c1 163-278.310 =c2 163A-1560 =c1 163-278.311 thru
=c2 163A-1561 thru =c1 163-278.315 reserved =c2 163A-1565 reserved
=c1 163-278.316 =c2 163A-1566
=c1 163-278.317 thru
=c2 163A-1567 thru =c1 163-278.319 reserved =c2 163A-1569
reserved
=c1 163-278.320 =c2 163A-1570
=c1
Subchapter IX

=c2

Article 27
=c1
Article 23

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-279 =c2 163A-1585 =c1 163-280 thru
163-281 previously repealed
=c1 163-282 =c2 163A-1586
=c1 163-283 =c2 163A-1587
=c1 163-283.1 =c2 163A-1588
=c1 163-284 =c2 163A-1589
=c1 163-284.1 =c2 163A-1590
=c1 163-285 previously repealed
=c1 163-286 =c2 163A-1591
=c1 163-287 =c2 163A-1592
=c1 163-288 =c2 163A-1593
=c1 163-288.1 =c2 163A-1594
=c1 163-288.1A =c2 163A-1595
=c1 163-288.2 =c2 163A-1596
=c1 163-288.3 =c2 163A-1597
=c1 163-289 =c2 163A-1598
=c1 163-290 =c2 163A-1599
=c1
Article 24

=c2

Part 2
=c1

163-291 =c2 163A-1615
=c1 163-292 =c2 163A-1616
=c1 163-293 =c2 163A-1617
=c1 163-294 =c2 163A-1618
=c1 163-294.1 =c2 163A-1619
=c1 163-294.2 =c2 163A-1620
=c1 163-294.3 =c2 163A-1621
=c1 163-294.4 =c2 163A-1622
=c1 163-295 =c2 163A-1623
=c1 163-296 =c2 163A-1624
=c1 163-297 =c2 163A-1625
=c1 163-298 =c2 163A-1626
=c1 163-299 =c2 163A-1627
=c1 163-300 =c2 163A-1628
=c1 163-301 =c2 163A-1629
=c1 163-302 =c2 163A-1630
=c1 163-303
previously repealed
=c1 163-304 =c2 163A-1631
=c1 163-305 =c2 163A-1632
=c1 163-306 =c2 163A-1633
=c1

Subchapter X repealed =c1
Article 25 repealed =te =c1
Chapter 163

=c2

Subchapter III

=c1

Subchapter I

=c2

Article 15

=c1

Article 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-1 =c2 163A-700
=c1 163-2 previously repealed
=c1 163-3 =c2 163A-701
=c1
Article 2

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-8 =c2 163A-716
=c1 163-9 =c2 163A-717 =c1 163-10 =c2 163A-718
=c1 163-11 =c2 163A-719
=c1 163-12 =c2 163A-720
=c1 163-13 =c2 163A-721
=c1
Subchapter II

=c2

Article 16

=c1

Article 3

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-19
=c2 163A-2 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-20 =c2 163A-740
=c1 163-21 =c2 163A-2 (in Article 1, not 16) =c1 163-22 =c2 163A-741
=c1 163-22.1
previously repealed =c1 163-22.2 =c2 163A-742
=c1 163-22.3 =c2 163A-743
=c1 163-23
=c2 163A-4 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-24 =c2 163A-744
=c1 163-25 =c2 163A-745
=c1 163-26 =c2 163A-6 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-27 =c2 163A-6 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1 163-27.1 =c2 163A-750
=c1 163-27.2 =c2 163A-7 (in Article 1, not 16) =c1 163-28
=c2 163A-5 (in Article 1, not 16)
=c1
Article 4

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-30 =c2 163A-766
=c1 163-31 =c2 163A-767
=c1 163-32 =c2 163A-768 =c1 163-33 =c2 163A-769
=c1 163-33.1 =c2 163A-770
=c1 163-33.2 =c2 163A-771
=c1 163-33.3 =c2 163A-772
=c1 163-34 =c2 163A-773
=c1 163-35 =c2 163A-774
=c1 163-35.1
(formerly =c1
163-35(b) (portion)) =c2 163A-775 =c1 163-36 =c2 163A-776
=c1 163-37 =c2 163A-777
=c1 163-37.1 =c2 163A-778 =c1
Article 4A

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-38 =c2 163A-795
=c1 163-39 =c2 163A-796
=c1 163-40 =c2 163A-797 =c1 163-40.1 =c2 163A-798
=c1

Article 5

=c2

Part 4
=c1 163-41 =c2 163A-815
=c1 163-41.1 =c2 163A-816
=c1 163-41.2 =c2 163A-817
=c1 163-42 =c2 163A-818
=c1 163-42.1 =c2 163A-819
=c1 163-43 =c2 163A-820
=c1 163-44 previously repealed
=c1 163-45 =c2 163A-821
=c1 163-46 =c2 163A-822 =c1 163-47 =c2 163A-823
=c1 163-48 =c2 163A-824
=c1
Subchapter III

=c2

Article 17

=c1

Article 6

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-54 =c2 163A-840
=c1 163-55 =c2 163A-841
=c1 163-56
previously repealed
=c1 163-57 =c2 163A-842
=c1 163-58
previously repealed
=c1 163-59 =c2 163A-843
=c1
Article 7
previously repealed

=c1

Article 7A

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-82.1 =c2 163A-860
=c1 163-82.2 =c2 163A-861
=c1 163-82.3 =c2 163A-862
=c1 163-82.4 =c2 163A-863
=c1 163-82.5 =c2 163A-864
=c1 163-82.6 =c2 163A-865
=c1 163-82.6A =c2 163A-866
=c1 163-82.7 =c2 163A-867
=c1 163-82.7A =c2 163A-868
=c1 163-82.8 =c2 163A-869
=c1 163-82.8A =c2 163A-869.1 =c1 163-82.9 =c2 163A-870
=c1 163-82.10 =c2 163A-871
=c1 163-82.10A =c2 163A-872
=c1 163-82.10B =c2 163A-873
=c1 163-82.11 =c2 163A-874
=c1 163-82.12 =c2 163A-875
=c1 163-82.13 =c2 163A-876
=c1 163-82.14 =c2 163A-877
=c1 163-82.15 =c2 163A-878
=c1 163-82.15A =c2 163A-879
=c1 163-82.16 =c2 163A-880
=c1 163-82.17 =c2 163A-881
=c1 163-82.18 =c2 163A-882
=c1 163-82.19 =c2 163A-883
=c1 163-82.20 =c2 163A-884
=c1 163-82.20A =c2 163A-885
=c1 163-82.21 =c2 163A-886
=c1 163-82.22 =c2 163A-887
=c1 163-82.23 =c2 163A-888
=c1 163-82.24 =c2 163A-889
=c1 163-82.25 previously repealed
=c1 163-82.26 =c2 163A-890
=c1 163-82.27 =c2 163A-891
=c1 163-82.28 =c2 163A-892
=c1
Article 8

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-84 =c2 163A-910
=c1 163-85 =c2 163A-911
=c1 163-86 =c2 163A-912
=c1 163-87 =c2 163A-913
=c1 163-88 =c2 163A-914
=c1 163-88.1 =c2 163A-915
=c1 163-89 =c2 163A-916
=c1 163-90 =c2 163A-917 =c1 163-90.1 =c2 163A-918
=c1 163-90.2 =c2 163A-919
=c1 163-90.3 =c2 163A-920
=c1

Article 8A

=c2

Part 4

=c1 163-91 =c2 163A-935
=c1

Subchapter IV

=c2

Article 18

=c1

Article 9
=c1 163-96 =c2 163A-950
=c1 163-97 =c2 163A-951
=c1 163-97.1 =c2 163A-952 =c1 163-98 =c2 163A-953
=c1 163-99 =c2 163A-954
=c1
Subchapter V
=c2 Article 19 =c1
Article 10

=c2

Part 1

=c1 163-104 =c2 163A-970
=c1 163-105 =c2 163A-971
=c1 163-106
(containing only former =c1
subsections (a), (a1)) =c2 163A-972 =c1 163-106.1 (containing former
=c1
163-106(b)) =c2 163A-973 =c1 163-106.2
(containing former =c1
163-106(c)) =c2 163A-974 =c1 163-106.3 (containing former =c1
163-106(d)) =c2 163A-975
=c1 163-106.4 (containing former =c1
163-106(e))
=c2 163A-976
=c1 163-106.5 (containing former =c1
163-106(f), (g), (j)) =c2 163A-977 =c1 163-106.6 (containing former =c1
163-106(h)) =c2 163A-978 =c1 163-107 =c2 163A-979
=c1 163-107.1 =c2 163A-980 =c1 163-108 =c2 163A-981
=c1 163-108.1 =c2 163A-982
=c1 163-109
previously repealed
=c1 163-110 =c2 163A-983
=c1 163-111 =c2 163A-984
=c1 163-112 =c2 163A-985
=c1 163-113 =c2 163A-986
=c1 163-114 =c2 163A-987
=c1 163-115 =c2 163A-988
=c1 163-116 thru 163-118
previously repealed
=c1 163-119 =c2 163A-989
=c1

Article 11

=c2

Part 2

=c1 163-122 =c2 163A-1005
=c1 163-123 =c2 163A-1006
=c1 163-124 =c2 163A-1007
=c1

Article 11A
previously repealed
=c1
Article 11B

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-127.1 =c2 163A-1025
=c1 163-127.2 =c2 163A-1026
=c1 163-127.3 =c2 163A-1027
=c1 163-127.4 =c2 163A-1028
=c1 163-127.5 =c2 163A-1029
=c1 163-127.6 =c2 163A-1030
=c1

Subchapter VI

=c2

Article 20

=c1

Article 12

=c2

Part 1

=c1 163-128 =c2 163A-1045
=c1 163-129 =c2 163A-1046
=c1 163-130 =c2 163A-1047
=c1 163-130.1 =c2 163A-1048
=c1 163-130.2 =c2 163A-1049
=c1 163-131 =c2 163A-1050
=c1

Article 12A

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-132.1
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1A
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1B
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1C =c2 163A-1065
=c1 163-132.2
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.3 =c2 163A-1071
=c1 163-132.3A =c2 163A-1072
=c1 163-132.4 =c2 163A-1073
=c1 163-132.5 =c2 163A-1074
=c1 163-132.5A
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.5B =c2 163A-1075 =c1 163-132.5C =c2 163A-1076
=c1 163-132.5D =c2 163A-1077 =c1 163-132.5E
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.5F =c2 163A-1078
=c1 163-132.5G =c2 163A-1079
=c1 163-132.6 previously repealed
=c1
Articles 13, 14 previously repealed

=c1

Article 14A

=c2

Part 3

=c1

Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-165 =c2 163A-1095 =c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-165.1 =c2 163A-1105
=c1 163-165.2 =c2 163A-1106
=c1 163-165.3 =c2 163A-1107
=c1 163-165.4 =c2 163A-1108
=c1 163-165.4A =c2 163A-1109
=c1 163-165.4B =c2 163A-1110
=c1 163-165.4C =c2 163A-1111
=c1 163-165.5 =c2 163A-1112
=c1 163-165.5A expired
=c1 163-165.5B =c2 163A-1113
=c1 163-165.6 =c2 163A-1114 =c1 163-165.7 =c2 163A-1115
=c1 163-165.8 =c2 163A-1116
=c1 163-165.9 =c2 163A-1117
=c1 163-165.9A =c2 163A-1118
=c1 163-165.10 =c2 163A-1119 =c1
Part 3

=c2

Subpart 3
=c1 163-166 previously repealed
=c1 163-166.01 =c2 163A-1130
=c1 163-166.1 =c2 163A-1131
=c1 163-166.2 =c2 163A-1132
=c1 163-166.3 =c2 163A-1133
=c1 163-166.4 =c2 163A-1134
=c1 163-166.5 =c2 163A-1135
=c1 163-166.6 =c2 163A-1136
=c1 163-166.7 =c2 163A-1137
=c1 163-166.7A =c2 163A-1138
=c1 163-166.8 =c2 163A-1139
=c1 163-166.9 =c2 163A-1140
=c1 163-166.10 =c2 163A-1141
=c1 163-166.11 =c2 163A-1142
=c1 163-166.11A =c2 163A-1143
=c1 163-166.12 =c2 163A-1144
=c1 163-166.13 =c2 163A-1145
=c1 163-166.14 =c2 163A-1146
=c1 163-166.15 =c2 163A-1147
=c1 163-166.16 =c2 163A-1145.1 =c1 163-166.17 =c2 163A-1145.2 =c1 163-166.18 =c2 163A-1145.3 =c1
Article 15
previously repealed

=c1

Article 15A

=c2

Part 4
=c1 163-182 =c2 163A-1165
=c1 163-182.1 =c2 163A-1166
=c1 163-182.1A =c2 163A-1167
=c1 163-182.1B =c2 163A-1168
=c1 163-182.2 =c2 163A-1169
=c1 163-182.3 =c2 163A-1170
=c1 163-182.4 =c2 163A-1171
=c1 163-182.5 =c2 163A-1172
=c1 163-182.6 =c2 163A-1173
=c1 163-182.7 =c2 163A-1174
=c1 163-182.7A =c2 163A-1175
=c1 163-182.8 =c2 163A-1176
=c1 163-182.9 =c2 163A-1177
=c1 163-182.10 =c2 163A-1178
=c1 163-182.11 =c2 163A-1179
=c1 163-182.12 =c2 163A-1180
=c1 163-182.13 =c2 163A-1181
=c1 163-182.13A =c2 163A-1182
=c1 163-182.14 =c2 163A-1183
=c1 163-182.15 =c2 163A-1184
=c1 163-182.16 =c2 163A-1185
=c1 163-182.17 =c2 163A-1186
=c1
Article 16
previously repealed
=c1
Article 17

=c2

Part 5
=c1 163-201 =c2 163A-1205
=c1 163-201.1 =c2 163A-1206
=c1 163-201.2
previously repealed =c1 163-202 =c2 163A-1207
=c1
Article 18

=c2

Part 6
=c1 163-208 =c2 163A-1225
=c1 163-209 =c2 163A-1226
=c1 163-209.1 =c2 163A-1227
=c1 163-209.2 =c2 163A-1228
=c1 163-210 =c2 163A-1229
=c1 163-211 =c2 163A-1230
=c1 163-212 =c2 163A-1231
=c1 163-213 =c2 163A-1232
=c1
Article 18A

=c2

Part 7
=c1 163-213.1 =c2 163A-1250
=c1 163-213.2 =c2 163A-1251
=c1 163-213.3 =c2 163A-1252
=c1 163-213.4 =c2 163A-1253
=c1 163-213.5 =c2 163A-1254
=c1 163-213.6 =c2 163A-1255
=c1 163-213.7 =c2 163A-1256
=c1 163-213.8 =c2 163A-1257
=c1 163-213.9 =c2 163A-1258
=c1 163-213.10 previously transferred
=c1 163-213.11
previously repealed =c1
Article 19

=c2

Part 8
=c1 163-218 =c2 163A-1275
=c1 163-219 =c2 163A-1276
=c1 163-220 =c2 163A-1277
=c1 163-221 =c2 163A-1278
=c1
Subchapter VII

=c2

Article 21
=c1
Article 20

=c2

Part 1 =c1 163-226 =c2 163A-1295
=c1 163-226.1 =c2 163A-1296
=c1 163-226.2 =c2 163A-1297
=c1 163-226.3 =c2 163A-1298
=c1 163-227
previously repealed
=c1 163-227.1 =c2 163A-1299
=c1 163-227.2
(containing former 163-227.2(a), (b), =c1
(c)-(e), (e2),
(f), (h), (i))
=c2 163A-1300 =c1 163-227.3 (recodified by the Codifier =c1
as 163-227.10)) =c2 163A-1305 =c1 163-227.4
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(b1), (j))
=c2 163A-1301 =c1 163-227.5 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(e1))
=c2 163A-1302 =c1 163-227.6 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(g), (g1))
=c2 163A-1303 =c1 163-227.7
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(g2), (g3)) =c2 163A-1304 =c1 163-227.8, 163-227.9 reserved =c1 163-228 =c2 163A-1306
=c1 163-229 =c2 163A-1307
=c1 163-230 previously repealed =c1 163-230.1 =c2 163A-1308
=c1 163-230.2 =c2 163A-1309 =c1 163-231 =c2 163A-1310
=c1 163-232 =c2 163A-1311
=c1 163-232.1 =c2 163A-1312
=c1 163-233 =c2 163A-1313
=c1 163-233.1 =c2 163A-1314
=c1 163-234 =c2 163A-1315
=c1 163-235
previously repealed
=c1 163-236 =c2 163A-1316
=c1 163-237 =c2 163A-1317
=c1 163-238 =c2 163A-1318
=c1 163-239 =c2 163A-1319
=c1 163-240 thru 163-240.5
Expired
=c1
Article 21 previously repealed

=c1

Article 21A

=c2

Part 2
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-258.1 =c2 163A-1335
=c1 163-258.2 =c2 163A-1336
=c1 163-258.3 =c2 163A-1337
=c1 163-258.4 =c2 163A-1338
=c1 163-258.5 =c2 163A-1339
=c1 163-258.6 =c2 163A-1340
=c1 163-258.7 =c2 163A-1341
=c1 163-258.8 =c2 163A-1342
=c1 163-258.9 =c2 163A-1343
=c1 163-258.10 =c2 163A-1344
=c1 163-258.11 =c2 163A-1345
=c1 163-258.12 =c2 163A-1346
=c1 163-258.13 =c2 163A-1347
=c1 163-258.14 =c2 163A-1348
=c1 163-258.15 =c2 163A-1349
=c1 163-258.16 =c2 163A-1350
=c1 163-258.17 =c2 163A-1351
=c1 163-258.18 =c2 163A-1352
=c1 163-258.19 =c2 163A-1353
=c1 163-258.20 =c2 163A-1354
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-258.26 =c2 163A-1365
=c1 163-258.27 =c2 163A-1366
=c1 163-258.28 =c2 163A-1367 =c1 163-258.29 =c2 163A-1368
=c1 163-258.30 =c2 163A-1369 =c1 163-258.31 =c2 163A-1370
=c1
Subchapter VIII

=c1

Article 22

=c2

Article 22
=c1 163-271 =c2 163A-1385
=c1 163-272
previously repealed
=c1 163-272.1 =c2 163A-1386
=c1 163-273 =c2 163A-1387
=c1 163-274 =c2 163A-1388
=c1 163-275 =c2 163A-1389
=c1 163-276 =c2 163A-1390
=c1 163-277 =c2 163A-1391
=c1 163-278 =c2 163A-1392
=c1
Article 22A

=c2

Article 23
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-278.5 =c2 163A-1410
=c1 163-278.6 =c2 163A-1411
=c1 163-278.7 =c2 163A-1412
=c1 163-278.7A =c2 163A-1413
=c1 163-278.8 =c2 163A-1414
=c1 163-278.8A =c2 163A-1415
=c1 163-278.8B =c2 163A-1416
=c1 163-278.8C =c2 163A-1417
=c1 163-278.9 =c2 163A-1418
=c1 163-278.9A =c2 163A-1419
=c1 163-278.10 =c2 163A-1420
=c1 163-278.10A =c2 163A-1421
=c1 163-278.11 =c2 163A-1422
=c1 163-278.12 =c2 163A-1423
=c1 163-278.12A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.12B reserved
=c1 163-278.12C =c2 163A-1424
=c1 163-278.13 =c2 163A-1425
=c1 163-278.13A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.13B =c2 163A-1426
=c1 163-278.13C =c2 163A-1427 =c1 163-278.14 =c2 163A-1428
=c1 163-278.14A =c2 163A-1429 =c1 163-278.15 =c2 163A-1430
=c1 163-278.16 =c2 163A-1431 =c1 163-278.16A =c2 163A-1432
=c1 163-278.16B =c2 163A-1433 =c1 163-278.17 =c2 163A-1434
=c1 163-278.18 =c2 163A-1435 =c1 163-278.19 =c2 163A-1436
=c1 163-278.19A =c2 163A-1437 =c1 163-278.19B =c2 163A-1438
=c1 163-278.20
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.21 =c2 163A-1439
=c1 163-278.22 =c2 163A-1440
=c1 163-278.23 =c2 163A-1441
=c1 163-278.24 =c2 163A-1442
=c1 163-278.25 =c2 163A-1443
=c1 163-278.26 =c2 163A-1444
=c1 163-278.27 =c2 163A-1445 =c1 163-278.28 =c2 163A-1446
=c1 163-278.29 =c2 163A-1447 =c1 163-278.30 =c2 163A-1448
=c1 163-278.31
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.32 =c2 163A-1449
=c1 163-278.33 =c2 163A-1450
=c1 163-278.34 =c2 163A-1451
=c1 163-278.34A =c2 163A-1452
=c1 163-278.35 =c2 163A-1453
=c1 163-278.36 previously repealed
=c1 163-278.37 =c2 163A-1454
=c1 163-278.38 =c2 163A-1455
=c1
Part 1A

=c2

Part 2 =c1 163-278.38Z =c2 163A-1475
=c1 163-278.39 =c2 163A-1476 =c1 163-278.39A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.39B previously recodified
=c1 163-278.39C =c2 163A-1477
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Part 3
=c1 163-278.40 =c2 163A-1495
=c1 163-278.40A =c2 163A-1496
=c1 163-278.40B =c2 163A-1497
=c1 163-278.40C =c2 163A-1498
=c1 163-278.40D =c2 163A-1499
=c1 163-278.40E =c2 163A-1500
=c1 163-278.40F =c2 163A-1501
=c1 163-278.40G =c2 163A-1502
=c1 163-278.40H =c2 163A-1503
=c1 163-278.40I =c2 163A-1504
=c1 163-278.40J =c2 163A-1505
=c1
Articles 22B, 22C
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22D

=c2

Article 24
=c1 163-278.69 =c2 163A-1520
=c1
Articles 22E, 22F
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22J

=c2

Article 25
=c1 163-278.99E =c2 163A-1535
=c1
Articles 22G, 22H
previously repealed
=c1
Articles 22I, K, L reserved
=c1
Article 22M

=c2

Article 26
=c1 163-278.300 =c2 163A-1550
=c1 163-278.301 =c2 163A-1551 =c1 163-278.302 thru
=c2 163A-1552
thru =c1 163-278.305 reserved =c2 163A-1555 reserved
=c1 163-278.306 =c2 163A-1556
=c1 163-278.307 =c2 163A-1557
=c1 163-278.308 =c2 163A-1558 =c1 163-278.309 =c2 163A-1559
=c1 163-278.310 =c2 163A-1560 =c1 163-278.311 thru
=c2 163A-1561 thru =c1 163-278.315 reserved =c2 163A-1565 reserved
=c1 163-278.316 =c2 163A-1566
=c1 163-278.317 thru
=c2 163A-1567 thru =c1 163-278.319 reserved =c2 163A-1569
reserved
=c1 163-278.320 =c2 163A-1570
=c1
Subchapter IX

=c2

Article 27
=c1
Article 23

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-279 =c2 163A-1585 =c1 163-280 thru
163-281 previously repealed
=c1 163-282 =c2 163A-1586
=c1 163-283 =c2 163A-1587
=c1 163-283.1 =c2 163A-1588
=c1 163-284 =c2 163A-1589
=c1 163-284.1 =c2 163A-1590
=c1 163-285 previously repealed
=c1 163-286 =c2 163A-1591
=c1 163-287 =c2 163A-1592
=c1 163-288 =c2 163A-1593
=c1 163-288.1 =c2 163A-1594
=c1 163-288.1A =c2 163A-1595
=c1 163-288.2 =c2 163A-1596
=c1 163-288.3 =c2 163A-1597
=c1 163-289 =c2 163A-1598
=c1 163-290 =c2 163A-1599
=c1
Article 24

=c2

Part 2
=c1

163-291 =c2 163A-1615
=c1 163-292 =c2 163A-1616
=c1 163-293 =c2 163A-1617
=c1 163-294 =c2 163A-1618
=c1 163-294.1 =c2 163A-1619
=c1 163-294.2 =c2 163A-1620
=c1 163-294.3 =c2 163A-1621
=c1 163-294.4 =c2 163A-1622
=c1 163-295 =c2 163A-1623
=c1 163-296 =c2 163A-1624
=c1 163-297 =c2 163A-1625
=c1 163-298 =c2 163A-1626
=c1 163-299 =c2 163A-1627
=c1 163-300 =c2 163A-1628
=c1 163-301 =c2 163A-1629
=c1 163-302 =c2 163A-1630
=c1 163-303
previously repealed
=c1 163-304 =c2 163A-1631
=c1 163-305 =c2 163A-1632
=c1 163-306 =c2 163A-1633
=c1

Subchapter X repealed =c1
Article 25 repealed =te =c1

163-90.1 =c2 163A-918
=c1 163-90.2 =c2 163A-919
=c1 163-90.3 =c2 163A-920
=c1

Article 8A

=c2

Part 4

=c1 163-91 =c2 163A-935
=c1

Subchapter IV

=c2

Article 18

=c1

Article 9
=c1 163-96 =c2 163A-950
=c1 163-97 =c2 163A-951
=c1 163-97.1 =c2 163A-952 =c1 163-98 =c2 163A-953
=c1 163-99 =c2 163A-954
=c1
Subchapter V
=c2 Article 19 =c1
Article 10

=c2

Part 1

=c1 163-104 =c2 163A-970
=c1 163-105 =c2 163A-971
=c1 163-106
(containing only former =c1
subsections (a), (a1)) =c2 163A-972 =c1 163-106.1 (containing former
=c1
163-106(b)) =c2 163A-973 =c1 163-106.2
(containing former =c1
163-106(c)) =c2 163A-974 =c1 163-106.3 (containing former =c1
163-106(d)) =c2 163A-975
=c1 163-106.4 (containing former =c1
163-106(e))
=c2 163A-976
=c1 163-106.5 (containing former =c1
163-106(f), (g), (j)) =c2 163A-977 =c1 163-106.6 (containing former =c1
163-106(h)) =c2 163A-978 =c1 163-107 =c2 163A-979
=c1 163-107.1 =c2 163A-980 =c1 163-108 =c2 163A-981
=c1 163-108.1 =c2 163A-982
=c1 163-109
previously repealed
=c1 163-110 =c2 163A-983
=c1 163-111 =c2 163A-984
=c1 163-112 =c2 163A-985
=c1 163-113 =c2 163A-986
=c1 163-114 =c2 163A-987
=c1 163-115 =c2 163A-988
=c1 163-116 thru 163-118
previously repealed
=c1 163-119 =c2 163A-989
=c1

Article 11

=c2

Part 2

=c1 163-122 =c2 163A-1005
=c1 163-123 =c2 163A-1006
=c1 163-124 =c2 163A-1007
=c1

Article 11A
previously repealed
=c1
Article 11B

=c2

Part 3

=c1 163-127.1 =c2 163A-1025
=c1 163-127.2 =c2 163A-1026
=c1 163-127.3 =c2 163A-1027
=c1 163-127.4 =c2 163A-1028
=c1 163-127.5 =c2 163A-1029
=c1 163-127.6 =c2 163A-1030
=c1

Subchapter VI

=c2

Article 20

=c1

Article 12

=c2

Part 1

=c1 163-128 =c2 163A-1045
=c1 163-129 =c2 163A-1046
=c1 163-130 =c2 163A-1047
=c1 163-130.1 =c2 163A-1048
=c1 163-130.2 =c2 163A-1049
=c1 163-131 =c2 163A-1050
=c1

Article 12A

=c2

Part 2
=c1 163-132.1
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1A
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1B
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.1C =c2 163A-1065
=c1 163-132.2
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.3 =c2 163A-1071
=c1 163-132.3A =c2 163A-1072
=c1 163-132.4 =c2 163A-1073
=c1 163-132.5 =c2 163A-1074
=c1 163-132.5A
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.5B =c2 163A-1075 =c1 163-132.5C =c2 163A-1076
=c1 163-132.5D =c2 163A-1077 =c1 163-132.5E
previously repealed
=c1 163-132.5F =c2 163A-1078
=c1 163-132.5G =c2 163A-1079
=c1 163-132.6 previously repealed
=c1
Articles 13, 14 previously repealed

=c1

Article 14A

=c2

Part 3

=c1

Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-165 =c2 163A-1095 =c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-165.1 =c2 163A-1105
=c1 163-165.2 =c2 163A-1106
=c1 163-165.3 =c2 163A-1107
=c1 163-165.4 =c2 163A-1108
=c1 163-165.4A =c2 163A-1109
=c1 163-165.4B =c2 163A-1110
=c1 163-165.4C =c2 163A-1111
=c1 163-165.5 =c2 163A-1112
=c1 163-165.5A expired
=c1 163-165.5B =c2 163A-1113
=c1 163-165.6 =c2 163A-1114 =c1 163-165.7 =c2 163A-1115
=c1 163-165.8 =c2 163A-1116
=c1 163-165.9 =c2 163A-1117
=c1 163-165.9A =c2 163A-1118
=c1 163-165.10 =c2 163A-1119 =c1
Part 3

=c2

Subpart 3
=c1 163-166 previously repealed
=c1 163-166.01 =c2 163A-1130
=c1 163-166.1 =c2 163A-1131
=c1 163-166.2 =c2 163A-1132
=c1 163-166.3 =c2 163A-1133
=c1 163-166.4 =c2 163A-1134
=c1 163-166.5 =c2 163A-1135
=c1 163-166.6 =c2 163A-1136
=c1 163-166.7 =c2 163A-1137
=c1 163-166.7A =c2 163A-1138
=c1 163-166.8 =c2 163A-1139
=c1 163-166.9 =c2 163A-1140
=c1 163-166.10 =c2 163A-1141
=c1 163-166.11 =c2 163A-1142
=c1 163-166.11A =c2 163A-1143
=c1 163-166.12 =c2 163A-1144
=c1 163-166.13 =c2 163A-1145
=c1 163-166.14 =c2 163A-1146
=c1 163-166.15 =c2 163A-1147
=c1 163-166.16 =c2 163A-1145.1 =c1 163-166.17 =c2 163A-1145.2 =c1 163-166.18 =c2 163A-1145.3 =c1
Article 15
previously repealed

=c1

Article 15A

=c2

Part 4
=c1 163-182 =c2 163A-1165
=c1 163-182.1 =c2 163A-1166
=c1 163-182.1A =c2 163A-1167
=c1 163-182.1B =c2 163A-1168
=c1 163-182.2 =c2 163A-1169
=c1 163-182.3 =c2 163A-1170
=c1 163-182.4 =c2 163A-1171
=c1 163-182.5 =c2 163A-1172
=c1 163-182.6 =c2 163A-1173
=c1 163-182.7 =c2 163A-1174
=c1 163-182.7A =c2 163A-1175
=c1 163-182.8 =c2 163A-1176
=c1 163-182.9 =c2 163A-1177
=c1 163-182.10 =c2 163A-1178
=c1 163-182.11 =c2 163A-1179
=c1 163-182.12 =c2 163A-1180
=c1 163-182.13 =c2 163A-1181
=c1 163-182.13A =c2 163A-1182
=c1 163-182.14 =c2 163A-1183
=c1 163-182.15 =c2 163A-1184
=c1 163-182.16 =c2 163A-1185
=c1 163-182.17 =c2 163A-1186
=c1
Article 16
previously repealed
=c1
Article 17

=c2

Part 5
=c1 163-201 =c2 163A-1205
=c1 163-201.1 =c2 163A-1206
=c1 163-201.2
previously repealed =c1 163-202 =c2 163A-1207
=c1
Article 18

=c2

Part 6
=c1 163-208 =c2 163A-1225
=c1 163-209 =c2 163A-1226
=c1 163-209.1 =c2 163A-1227
=c1 163-209.2 =c2 163A-1228
=c1 163-210 =c2 163A-1229
=c1 163-211 =c2 163A-1230
=c1 163-212 =c2 163A-1231
=c1 163-213 =c2 163A-1232
=c1
Article 18A

=c2

Part 7
=c1 163-213.1 =c2 163A-1250
=c1 163-213.2 =c2 163A-1251
=c1 163-213.3 =c2 163A-1252
=c1 163-213.4 =c2 163A-1253
=c1 163-213.5 =c2 163A-1254
=c1 163-213.6 =c2 163A-1255
=c1 163-213.7 =c2 163A-1256
=c1 163-213.8 =c2 163A-1257
=c1 163-213.9 =c2 163A-1258
=c1 163-213.10 previously transferred
=c1 163-213.11
previously repealed =c1
Article 19

=c2

Part 8
=c1 163-218 =c2 163A-1275
=c1 163-219 =c2 163A-1276
=c1 163-220 =c2 163A-1277
=c1 163-221 =c2 163A-1278
=c1
Subchapter VII

=c2

Article 21
=c1
Article 20

=c2

Part 1 =c1 163-226 =c2 163A-1295
=c1 163-226.1 =c2 163A-1296
=c1 163-226.2 =c2 163A-1297
=c1 163-226.3 =c2 163A-1298
=c1 163-227
previously repealed
=c1 163-227.1 =c2 163A-1299
=c1 163-227.2
(containing former 163-227.2(a), (b), =c1
(c)-(e), (e2),
(f), (h), (i))
=c2 163A-1300 =c1 163-227.3 (recodified by the Codifier =c1
as 163-227.10)) =c2 163A-1305 =c1 163-227.4
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(b1), (j))
=c2 163A-1301 =c1 163-227.5 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(e1))
=c2 163A-1302 =c1 163-227.6 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(g), (g1))
=c2 163A-1303 =c1 163-227.7
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(g2), (g3)) =c2 163A-1304 =c1 163-227.8, 163-227.9 reserved =c1 163-228 =c2 163A-1306
=c1 163-229 =c2 163A-1307
=c1 163-230 previously repealed =c1 163-230.1 =c2 163A-1308
=c1 163-230.2 =c2 163A-1309 =c1 163-231 =c2 163A-1310
=c1 163-232 =c2 163A-1311
=c1 163-232.1 =c2 163A-1312
=c1 163-233 =c2 163A-1313
=c1 163-233.1 =c2 163A-1314
=c1 163-234 =c2 163A-1315
=c1 163-235
previously repealed
=c1 163-236 =c2 163A-1316
=c1 163-237 =c2 163A-1317
=c1 163-238 =c2 163A-1318
=c1 163-239 =c2 163A-1319
=c1 163-240 thru 163-240.5
Expired
=c1
Article 21 previously repealed

=c1

Article 21A

=c2

Part 2
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-258.1 =c2 163A-1335
=c1 163-258.2 =c2 163A-1336
=c1 163-258.3 =c2 163A-1337
=c1 163-258.4 =c2 163A-1338
=c1 163-258.5 =c2 163A-1339
=c1 163-258.6 =c2 163A-1340
=c1 163-258.7 =c2 163A-1341
=c1 163-258.8 =c2 163A-1342
=c1 163-258.9 =c2 163A-1343
=c1 163-258.10 =c2 163A-1344
=c1 163-258.11 =c2 163A-1345
=c1 163-258.12 =c2 163A-1346
=c1 163-258.13 =c2 163A-1347
=c1 163-258.14 =c2 163A-1348
=c1 163-258.15 =c2 163A-1349
=c1 163-258.16 =c2 163A-1350
=c1 163-258.17 =c2 163A-1351
=c1 163-258.18 =c2 163A-1352
=c1 163-258.19 =c2 163A-1353
=c1 163-258.20 =c2 163A-1354
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-258.26 =c2 163A-1365
=c1 163-258.27 =c2 163A-1366
=c1 163-258.28 =c2 163A-1367 =c1 163-258.29 =c2 163A-1368
=c1 163-258.30 =c2 163A-1369 =c1 163-258.31 =c2 163A-1370
=c1
Subchapter VIII

=c1

Article 22

=c2

Article 22
=c1 163-271 =c2 163A-1385
=c1 163-272
previously repealed
=c1 163-272.1 =c2 163A-1386
=c1 163-273 =c2 163A-1387
=c1 163-274 =c2 163A-1388
=c1 163-275 =c2 163A-1389
=c1 163-276 =c2 163A-1390
=c1 163-277 =c2 163A-1391
=c1 163-278 =c2 163A-1392
=c1
Article 22A

=c2

Article 23
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-278.5 =c2 163A-1410
=c1 163-278.6 =c2 163A-1411
=c1 163-278.7 =c2 163A-1412
=c1 163-278.7A =c2 163A-1413
=c1 163-278.8 =c2 163A-1414
=c1 163-278.8A =c2 163A-1415
=c1 163-278.8B =c2 163A-1416
=c1 163-278.8C =c2 163A-1417
=c1 163-278.9 =c2 163A-1418
=c1 163-278.9A =c2 163A-1419
=c1 163-278.10 =c2 163A-1420
=c1 163-278.10A =c2 163A-1421
=c1 163-278.11 =c2 163A-1422
=c1 163-278.12 =c2 163A-1423
=c1 163-278.12A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.12B reserved
=c1 163-278.12C =c2 163A-1424
=c1 163-278.13 =c2 163A-1425
=c1 163-278.13A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.13B =c2 163A-1426
=c1 163-278.13C =c2 163A-1427 =c1 163-278.14 =c2 163A-1428
=c1 163-278.14A =c2 163A-1429 =c1 163-278.15 =c2 163A-1430
=c1 163-278.16 =c2 163A-1431 =c1 163-278.16A =c2 163A-1432
=c1 163-278.16B =c2 163A-1433 =c1 163-278.17 =c2 163A-1434
=c1 163-278.18 =c2 163A-1435 =c1 163-278.19 =c2 163A-1436
=c1 163-278.19A =c2 163A-1437 =c1 163-278.19B =c2 163A-1438
=c1 163-278.20
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.21 =c2 163A-1439
=c1 163-278.22 =c2 163A-1440